Hawaii statutes.
[§663‑10.99] Trespass;
limited liability of agricultural land owner. (a) An owner of
agricultural land shall not be liable for any injury, death, loss, or damage
suffered by a trespasser on the owner's agricultural land, unless the injury,
death, loss, or damage was:

(1) Intentionally inflicted upon the trespasser by
the owner of the land; or

(2) Caused by the gross negligence of the owner of
the land.

(b) For purposes of this section, unless the
context otherwise requires:

"Agricultural land" means any land in
excess of four acres used primarily for a farming operation, as defined in
section 165-2; provided that the term shall include land used for farm
buildings and dwellings and roads and irrigation infrastructure associated with
the agricultural land.

"Fallow" means land associated with
agricultural production that is left unseeded or unplanted for one or more
growing seasons.

"Owner" means the possessor of a fee
interest, a tenant, lessee, occupant, or person, group, club, partnership,
family, organization, entity, or corporation that is in control, possession, or
use of the land, and their members, agents, partners, representatives,
shareholders, and employees.

"Trespasser" means a person who
enters or remains unlawfully on the agricultural land without the permission of
the owner, and the lands:

(1) Are fenced, enclosed, secured in a manner
designed to exclude the general public, or marked by a structure or barrier,
including a cattle grid, cattle grate, or other obstacle used to secure livestock;

(2) Have a sign or signs displayed on the land that
are sufficient to give reasonable notice and that read as follows: "No
Trespassing" or a substantially similar message; provided that the sign or
signs shall consist of letters not less than two inches in height and shall be
placed at reasonable intervals along the boundary line of the land and at roads
and trails entering the land in a manner and position as to be clearly
noticeable from outside the boundary line; or

(3) At the time of entry, are fallow or have a
visible presence or evidence of livestock-raising, such as cattle, horses,
water troughs, shelters, or paddocks, or a crop:

(A) Under cultivation;

(B) In the process of being harvested; or

(C) That has been harvested. [L 2011, c 208, §3]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next